North Dakota statutes. TITLE 4 Agriculture
CHAPTER 4-10.1 Potato Industry Promotion Act [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18]

4-10.1-01.
Title of act. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-10.1-02.
Legislative policy. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-10.1-03.
Definitions. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-10.1-04.
North Dakota potato council — Membership — Election — Term. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-10.1-05.
Potato districts — Establishment. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-10.1-06.
Meetings — Quorum — Compensation and expenses of council. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-10.1-07.
Expenditure of funds. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-10.1-08.
Potato council powers and duties. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-10.1-09.
Tax levied — Continuing appropriation. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-10.1-10.
Appropriation of funds. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-10.1-11.
Storage breakdown loss — Tax refund. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1975, ch. 52, § 5.

4-10.1-12.
Nonparticipating growers — Refunds. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-10.1-13.
Referendum by growers. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-10.1-14.
Collection of unpaid assessment. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-10.1-15.
Misdemeanor to violate provisions of this chapter. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-10.1-16.
Penalty for nonpayment of assessment. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-10.1-17.
Records of council — Inspection. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.